Wisconsin, session 2025, AB308.
do enact as follows:AB308,1Section 1. 20.926 of the statutes is created to read:20.926 Prohibitions on funding for health services for unlawfully present individuals. (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), no funds of this state or of any county, city, village, town, or long-term care district under s. 46.2895 or of any subdivision or agency of this state, including an authority created in ch. 233, or of any subdivision or agency of any county, city, village, or town and no federal funds passing through the state treasury shall be authorized for or paid to any person to subsidize, reimburse, or otherwise provide compensation for any health care services for an individual who is not lawfully present in the United States.(2) (a) Subsection (1) does not apply to the extent that payment of funds described under sub. (1) is required under federal law.(b) Subsection (1) shall apply only to the extent that the application of the restriction does not result in the loss of any federal funds. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab308 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab308 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB308 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB308 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB308: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting